Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-945.01
Act, how cited.

Sections 2-945.01 to 2-966 shall be known and may be cited as the Noxious Weed Control Act.

Laws 1989, LB 49, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 450;

Laws 2004, LB 869, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 1226, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB701, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB1038, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB807, § 1.
July 18, 2026